Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB671.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2501 of the act of June 29, 1996 (P.L.434, No.67), known as the Job Enhancement Act, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 2501. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Air ambulance crash impacted business." A business 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 materially impacted by the air ambulance crash in Philadelphia on January 31, 2025.* * *"Committee." The Operational Committee established under section 2503.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2512. Financial assistance to air ambulance crash impacted businesses.(a) Air ambulance crash grant program.--From money appropriated to the authority for grants under this subsection, the authority shall issue grants to eligible institutions or nonprofits to provide technical assistance, training or other support to air ambulance crash impacted businesses.(b) Air ambulance crash loan program.--From money appropriated to the authority for loans under this subsection, the authority shall provide loans to eligible institutions for the purpose of providing funding to eligible institutions to make loans to air ambulance crash impacted businesses. (c) Report.--The authority shall prepare, in consultation with the committee, a report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives within 180 days of the implementation of the air ambulance crash grant and loan programs. The report shall include the amount of money allocated to the air ambulance crash grant and loan programs under this section, the name and location of nonprofits and community development financial institutions accredited by the department and the number of grants and loans disbursed to air ambulance 20250SB0671PN0715 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 crash impacted businesses.(d) Study.--The Joint State Government Commission shall conduct, in consultation with the authority and committee, a comprehensive study and issue a report on providing grants to small businesses in emergency situations within 180 days of the implementation of the air ambulance crash grant and loan programs. The study shall:(1) Examine economic recovery approaches for small businesses in other states after an emergency situation.(2) Identify the best practices for economic redevelopment of a small business after an emergency situation.(e) Prohibition on issuance.--The authority may not award a grant or loan under this section later than five years after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0671PN0715 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516